Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-35,108
Hospital authority; bonds, interim certificates, obligations; issuance; validation.

Any provision of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds, interim certificates, or other obligations issued pursuant to the provisions of sections 23-3579 to 23-35,120 shall be fully negotiable.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 35;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.108.